Maryland, session 2026, SB0868.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the State Highway Administration shall expand the scope of the existing Maryland
Route 410 (East–West Highway) Pedestrian Safety Action Plan project to include the public
rights–of–way along East–West Highway from the intersection of Maryland Route 500
(Queens Chapel Road) east to U.S. Route 1 (Baltimore Avenue).
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.